test/src/morphology/N-araagwz_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - arāgõz: # Noun 181 'eng /est harakas/fin' - full paradigm
     arāgõz+N+Sg+Nom: arāgõz
     arāgõz+N+Sg+Gen: arāgõ
     arāgõz+N+Sg+Par: arāgõzt
     arāgõz+N+Sg+Dat: arāgõn
     arāgõz+N+Sg+Ins: arāgõks
     arāgõz+N+Sg+Ill: [arāgõ, arāgõz]
     arāgõz+N+Sg+Ela: arāgõst
     arāgõz+N+Pl+Nom: arāgõd
     arāgõz+N+Pl+Gen: arāgõd
     arāgõz+N+Pl+Par: arāgidi
     arāgõz+N+Pl+Dat: arāgõdõn
     arāgõz+N+Pl+Ins: arāgõdõks
     arāgõz+N+Pl+Ill: arāgiž
     arāgõz+N+Pl+Ela: arāgist
